New York, session 2025-2026, S9837.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1005 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 15-a to read as follows: 3 15-a. To make available low-cost power and energy services to provid- 4 ers of services as defined in section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, to 5 nonprofit organizations, facilities, or programs providing services for 6 individuals with developmental and/or intellectual disabilities, 7 provided such power and energy services are used directly and exclusive- 8 ly for the conduct of such services and operations within the state of 9 New York. The authority shall establish criteria for eligibility and 10 may require evidence demonstrating that the receipt of such low-cost 11 power and energy services will result in demonstrable benefits including 12 cost savings, reinvestment in services, or enhanced access to care. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14634-01-6